Idaho statutes. Title 49 MOTOR VEHICLES
Chapter 2 GENERAL
§ 49-217. Regulations relative to school buses.

Any officer or employee of any school or school district operating a school bus who violates any regulations promulgated in conformance with the provisions of section 49-201, Idaho Code, may be guilty of misconduct and subject to removal from office or employment. Any person operating a school bus under contract with a school or school district who fails to comply with any regulations may be guilty of breach of contract and such contract may be cancelled after notice of hearing by the responsible officers of the school or school district.

§ 49-218. Designation of authorized emergency vehicles.

The director of the Idaho state police shall designate any particular vehicle as an authorized emergency vehicle upon a finding that designation of that vehicle is necessary to the preservation of life or property, or to the execution of emergency governmental functions.

Any person who operates a motor vehicle in a manner which would lead one to reasonably believe it was an emergency vehicle without prior approval of the director of the Idaho state police, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be subject to a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300) and may be incarcerated for not more than thirty (30) days in jail for each occurrence.

§ 49-219. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-220. [Reserved.]

It shall be the responsibility of the owner of real property to remove from his property any hedge, shrubbery, fence, wall or other sight obstructions of any nature, except public traffic or highway signs, buildings and trees, where these sight obstructions constitute a potential traffic hazard. The above sight obstructions shall not extend more than three (3) feet, or less than ten (10) feet, in height above the existing center line highway elevation within the vision triangle of vehicle operators. The boundaries of the vision triangle are defined by measuring from the intersection of the edges of two (2) adjacent highways forty (40) feet along each highway and connecting the two (2) points with a straight line. The sight distance obstruction restriction is also applicable to railroad-highway grade crossings with vision triangle defined by measuring forty (40) feet along the railroad property line when intersecting with a highway.

When the department or any local authority determines that a traffic hazard exists, it may notify the owner and order that the hazard be removed within an appropriate time as determined by the department or local authority, considering the circumstances and conditions involved. The appropriate time may be specified in the notice. Such notice shall not obligate the department or local authorities to pursue removal or abatement until all legal remedies are exhausted.

The failure of the owner to remove the traffic hazard within the appropriate specified time shall constitute a misdemeanor and every day the owner shall fail to remove the obstruction may be considered a separate and distinct offense. Civil action may also be initiated by state or local officials to enforce vision triangle restrictions.

Local officials may, by resolution or ordinance, establish standards and procedures for protecting vision triangles at the intersections of local streets and roads. Such locally adopted standards or procedures, which may be more or less restrictive than the provisions hereof, shall not modify the standards established by this section concerning intersections with state maintained highways and intersections with railroads.

§ 49-222. Rights of owners of real property.

Nothing in this title shall be construed to prevent the owner of real property used by the public for purposes of vehicular travel by permission of the owner, and not as a matter of right, from prohibiting such use, or from requiring other or different or additional conditions than those specified in this title, or otherwise regulating such use as may seem best to the owner, except as provided in section 49-213, Idaho Code.

§ 49-223. Sale of nonconforming traffic-control devices.

A person shall not sell nor offer for sale any sign, signal, marking or other device intended to regulate, warn or guide traffic unless it conforms with the adopted state manual and specifications.

§ 49-224. [Repealed.]

§ 49-225. [Amended and Redesignated.

§ 49-226. Filing false affidavit of theft or embezzlement of a vehicle.

It shall be unlawful and a felony for the owner of any vehicle to file an affidavit as required in section 49-449, Idaho Code, knowing the same to be false or misleading.

§ 49-227. Operating vehicle without owner’s consent.

Any person who shall operate a vehicle, not his own, without the consent of the owner, and with intent temporarily to deprive the owner of his possession of such vehicle, without intent to steal the vehicle, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, unless the damages caused to the vehicle as a result of a violation of this section exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in value, or the value of property taken from the vehicle exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000), or a combination of the damages caused to the vehicle and the value of property taken exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case such person is guilty of a felony. The consent of the owner of a vehicle to its taking or operating shall not in any case be presumed or implied because of such owner’s consent on a previous occasion to the taking or operating of the vehicle by the same or a different person. Any person who assists in, or is a party or accessory to or an accomplice in any unauthorized taking or operation shall also be guilty of a misdemeanor, unless the damages caused to the vehicle as a result of a violation of this section exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) in value, or the value of property taken from the vehicle exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000), or a combination of the damages caused to the vehicle and the value of property taken exceeds one thousand dollars ($1,000), in which case such person is guilty of a felony. For the purpose of this section vehicle shall include, but is not limited to vehicles defined in section 49-123, Idaho Code, boats, airplanes, snowmobiles, three and four wheel all-terrain vehicles, hot air balloons, hang gliders, jet skis and motorcycles.

§ 49-228. Receiving or transferring stolen vehicles.

Any person who, with intent to procure or pass title to a vehicle which he knows or has reason to believe has been stolen, shall receive or transfer possession of the vehicle from or to another, or who shall have in his possession any vehicle which he knows or has reason to believe has been stolen, and who is not an officer of the law engaged at the time in the performance of his duty as an officer of the law, shall be guilty of a felony and upon conviction shall be punished as provided in section 18-112, Idaho Code.

§ 49-229. Injuring vehicle.

Except as authorized by section 49-1806, Idaho Code, any person who shall individually, or in association with one (1) or more others, willfully break, injure, tamper with or remove any part or parts of any vehicle for the purpose of injuring, defacing or destroying the vehicle, or temporarily or permanently preventing its useful operation, or for any purpose against the will or without the consent of the owner of the vehicle, or who shall in any other manner willfully or maliciously interfere with or prevent the running or operation of the vehicle shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

§ 49-230. Tampering with vehicle. [Repealed.]

Repealed by S.L. 2015, ch. 142, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 49-231. Farm implements — Purchasing or selling when identifying number altered or defaced a felony.

Any person who knowingly buys, receives, disposes of, sells, offers for sale or has in his possession any tractor, trailer, or other farm implement or engine removed from a tractor or farm implement from which the manufacturer’s serial or engine number or other distinguishing number or identification mark or number, has been removed, defaced, covered, altered or destroyed for the purpose of concealing or misrepresenting the identity of the tractor, trailer or farm implement or engine, is guilty of a felony.

§ 49-231A. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-232. Fraudulent removal or alteration of numbers prohibited.

No person shall with fraudulent intent deface, destroy or alter the manufacturer’s serial or engine number or other distinguishing number or identification mark of a vehicle or a tractor, or other farm implement; nor shall any person place or stamp any fictitious or unauthorized serial, engine or other number of distinguishing mark with the intention that the same pass for a number or mark placed thereon by the manufacturer of the vehicle or tractor or farm implement. This section shall not prohibit the restoration by an owner or repair man of an original serial, engine or other number or distinguishing mark, but is designed to prohibit and prevent the fraudulent removal or alteration of marks or numbers placed on the vehicles or tractors and other farm implements by the manufacturer.

§ 49-233, 49-234. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-235. Enforcement by peace officers.

The director of the Idaho state police, his officers and employees, and other peace officers as the director of the Idaho state police may authorize in writing may, upon reasonable cause, require the driver of a vehicle to stop and submit the vehicle and its equipment to an inspection and a test as may be appropriate.

In the event a vehicle is found to be in an unsafe condition, or the required equipment is not present, or is not in proper repair and adjustment, the officer shall give a written notice to the driver and send a copy to the Idaho state police. The notice shall require that the vehicle be placed in safe condition and its equipment in proper repair and adjustment, and a certificate of inspection and approval for the vehicle be obtained within five (5) days. Every owner or driver upon receiving such a notice shall comply with the notice and shall within the five (5) days secure an endorsement upon the notice by the person making the repair or adjustment that the vehicle is in safe condition and its equipment in proper repair and adjustment, and shall forward the notice to the Idaho state police.

No person shall operate any vehicle after receiving a notice as provided in this section, until the vehicle and its equipment have been placed in proper repair and adjustment and otherwise made to conform to the requirements of this title.

§ 49-236. Penalties.

It is a misdemeanor for any person to violate any of the provisions of this title except the provisions of chapter 3, other than sections 49-301, 49-316, 49-331 and 49-332, Idaho Code, chapter 4 and chapters 6 through 9 of this title, unless otherwise specifically provided.

It is an infraction for any person to violate any of the provisions of chapters 3, 4 and 6 through 9 of this title unless otherwise specifically provided.

Any offense punishable by imprisonment in the state penitentiary is a felony.

Punishments shall be as provided in sections 18-111, 18-112, 18-113 and 18-113A, Idaho Code, unless otherwise specifically provided.

Whenever a person is arrested for any violation of the provisions of this title declared to be a felony, he shall be dealt with in like manner as upon arrest for the commission of any other felony.

It is an infraction punishable by a fine of seventy-five dollars ($75.00) for any person to violate the provisions of either section 49-1229, 49-1232 or 49-1428, Idaho Code.

§ 49-237. Records to be sent to department.

Upon the conviction or reversal of conviction of any person for the violation of any of the provisions of this title, the judicial officer before whom the proceedings are had or the clerk of the district court shall immediately transmit the facts of the case to the department, either in paper or electronic form, including the name, address, date of birth, and the driver’s license number or social security number of the party charged, and any judgment issued, including a withheld judgment. The judicial officer or the clerk of the district court shall also forward to the department information regarding the character of the punishment, and the amount of any fine imposed and paid, the ordered sentence and its terms, and the ordered suspension period, including when the suspension is to commence. The information provided to the department shall be certified if submitted in paper form; no certification is required for electronic transfers of information. The department shall enter the facts either in the records of registered vehicles, or in the records of registered dealers, or in the driver’s license records, as the case may be, opposite the name of the person so convicted, and in the case of any other person, in a record of offenders, to be kept for that purpose. If an individual is reincarcerated while that person’s driver’s license or driving privileges are suspended, the department of correction is to notify the department that the individual is reincarcerated, as well as the terms and period of reincarceration. If the conviction be reversed on appeal, the person whose conviction has been reversed may serve on the department a certified copy of the order of reversal, and the department shall enter the reversal in the proper records.

§ 49-238. Charging violations and rule in civil actions.

In every charge of violation of any speed regulation in this title, the complaint or citation shall specify the speed at which the defendant is alleged to have been driving and the speed limit applicable within the district or at the location.

The provision of this title declaring maximum speed limitations shall not be construed to relieve the plaintiff in any civil action from the burden of proving negligence on the part of the defendant as the proximate cause of an accident.

Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation of speed limitations, proof of determination of the maximum speed by the local jurisdictions and the existence of appropriate signs shall constitute conclusive evidence of the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to a bridge or structure.

§ 49-239. Disposition of fines, penalties, forfeitures and fees.

[(1)] All fines, penalties, and forfeitures collected for violations of any of the provisions of chapter 4 of this title, shall be remitted to the state treasurer and placed in the highway distribution account.

(2) All other fines, penalties and forfeitures collected by any court or judge, for violation of motor vehicle laws, for violation of state driving privilege laws or for any other provisions of this title, shall be distributed as provided in section 19-4705, Idaho Code.

(3) All fees collected shall be remitted to the state treasurer and placed in the highway distribution account unless otherwise provided in this title.

§ 49-240. Certain circumstances for forfeiture of bond for traffic offenses.

Whenever a person has received a written uniform misdemeanor traffic citation, summons or complaint containing a notice to appear before a magistrate, and if the attorney prosecuting the case and the defendant concur that it is in the best interest of justice that the defendant may post and forfeit an amount of the bond agreed upon by the parties, the court shall dismiss the charge. When bond is forfeited under the provisions of this subsection, no violation points, as prescribed in section 49-326, Idaho Code, shall accrue. A forfeiture of bond under the provisions of this subsection shall not be recorded as a conviction, but the proceeds of the bond shall be distributed as court costs and fines as though there were a conviction.

The provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall not be available when citations, summons or complaints are written for a violation of the provisions of section 18-8001, 18-8004, 18-8006 or 49-1401, Idaho Code.

Whenever a person who, while operating a commercial motor vehicle or whenever a holder of a class A, B or C license, has received a written uniform traffic citation, summons or complaint containing a notice to appear before a magistrate for an offense arising out of the operation of a motor vehicle, any bond forfeiture shall be treated as though it were a conviction.

§ 49-241, 49-242. [Reserved.]

The provisions of this title are declared to be severable, and if any provision of this title or the application of that provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, that declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this title.

§ 49-244. Idaho residency and domicile requirements — Indian reservations.

Notwithstanding the residency and domicile requirements provided for in chapters 1, 4 and 5 of title 49, Idaho Code, enrolled tribal members, residing and domiciled within the boundaries of a federally recognized Indian reservation, which boundaries are located in whole or in part within this state, shall be considered Idaho residents for purposes of vehicle registration and vehicle titling in Idaho.

§ 49-245, 49-246. [Amended and Redesignated.]

§ 49-221. Removal of traffic hazards.

§ 49-243. Severability.